Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. General Regulatory Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d Carriers §§ 144 to 147.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 171 to 210.

§ 31-18-301.
Permanent cards and decals; operation without authority; inspections.

The authority of any motor carrier issued after April 1, 1989, is valid until cancelled, suspended or revoked.

No motor carrier that is required to have authority shall operate on the highways without a copy of the current authority carried in each power unit.

A copy of the current authority shall upon demand, be presented by the driver of the vehicle to any of the field investigators of the department, members of the state highway patrol or authorized personnel of the department at its ports of entry. Investigators, troopers and authorized personnel may compel the driver to stop and submit the vehicle to an inspection by signs directing commercial vehicles or the motor carrier to stop at ports of entry or other locations designated by the department or by warning devices on vehicles of investigators, troopers or authorized personnel. All ports of entry shall post signs or signals indicating when the facility is open and directing commercial vehicles or motor carriers to stop for inspection. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a vehicle that is properly registered, has a proper fuel license, valid authority and is legal in size and weight, upon approval by the department, may be authorized to bypass a port of entry unless specifically directed to stop by an investigator, trooper or authorized personnel or by a sign or signal specifically requiring those vehicles to stop. These vehicles may, however, be required to slow to the designated speed and use the directed traffic lane for size and weight screening purposes.

Vehicles checking through a port of entry shall not be required to stop at any other port of entry within the state on that trip unless there is an increase in the size or weight of the vehicle or its load, or unless specifically directed to stop by an investigator, trooper or authorized personnel or by a sign or signal specifically requiring those vehicles to stop.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-301

; Laws 1985, ch. 207, § 2; 1987, ch. 106, § 1; ch. 150, § 1; 1989, ch. 129, § 1; 1991, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 1999, ch. 3, § 1; 2020 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Inspections. —

An oil company and a driver of one of the oil company's propane trucks failed to establish that a highway patrol officer's warrantless safety inspection at a port of entry, after a valid traffic stop on a nearby road, violated the fourth amendment. V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “suspended” following “cancelled.”

§ 31-18-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to the deviation of approved rates and fares of common carriers, and the prohibition of unfair competition.

§ 31-18-303.
Authority of department to adopt rules and regulations governing drivers, equipment and hazardous materials; exceptions; maximum operating hours.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations prescribing the permissible operating time and other requirements of motor carrier drivers, equipment and the transportation of hazardous materials which are consistent with comparable regulations of the United States department of transportation.

Public utility personnel and associated emergency personnel are exempt from driving time regulations only if an emergency exists. If an occasion or instance jeopardizes public health or safety or endangers property, an emergency situation exists. In such an event, if public utilities and associated emergency personnel respond, they are exempt from driving time regulations if the public utility exercises due diligence in contacting state or local officials, and documents its efforts.

Unless exception is made by the department after public hearings held pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the rules of the department shall be current with rules adopted by the United States department of transportation, as now or hereafter amended.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

Intrastate, for-hire transportation of passengers in vehicles with an occupant capacity of seven (7) or more, but not more than fifteen (15), is subject to the hours of service requirements of 49 CFR Part 395 as it applies to vehicles with occupant capacities of fifteen (15) or more, as adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-8-304; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 4; ch. 98, § 1; ch. 101, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to discrimination generally, see chapter 4 of title 40.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (d), which read: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, all private carriers, except a farmer or rancher, or his employee, transporting an agricultural product or material used in agricultural production in a vehicle owned by the farmer or rancher within one hundred fifty (150) miles of the farm or ranch, shall comply with the hazardous materials regulations as provided by this section.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former § 37-8-304, effective July 1, 1993.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Stated

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The State of Specific Commodity Haulers and the Motor Carrier Act,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 197.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Carrier's “public duty” exception to absolute or strict liability arising out of carriage of hazardous substances, 31 ALR4th 658.

§ 31-18-304.
Display of name or trade name.

No person may operate a commercial vehicle unless the name or trade name of the motor carrier is displayed.

The display required by subsection (a) of this section shall be of a size, shape and color which is legible from fifty (50) feet in daylight when the vehicle is not moving. The display shall be maintained so as to remain legible. If the display required by subsection (a) of this section is otherwise maintained, separate display on semitrailers and trailers is not required.

This section does not apply to vehicles:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Identified as property of the United States, this state or any political subdivision of this state; or

Classified as implements of husbandry.

No person shall operate a commercial vehicle subject to subsection (a) of this section and displaying the name or trade name of the motor carrier if the agreement between the motor carrier and the person authorizing the person to operate the vehicle has expired or is terminated.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 207, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-305

; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (c)(i), which read: “Being transported to a dealer, from a manufacturer or between dealers”; and repealed (c)(ii), which read: “Being demonstrated by or delivered to a purchaser by a dealer or manufacturer.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, repealed a former §

37-8-305

, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, § 12, and related to contract carriers legally operating on January 1, 1935.